Illinois, session 104th, SB638.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 10-4-1.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-1.5 new)7    Sec. 10-4-1.5. Other postemployment benefit trusts.8    (a) As used in this Section, "OPEB trust" means an other 9postemployment benefit trust established by a municipality for 10the purpose of providing for the funding and payment of health 11and other fringe benefits for retired or terminated employees 12of the municipality or employees of the municipality with 13disabilities or for their dependents and beneficiaries.14    (b) If the moneys in the general fund of a municipality 15exceed the municipality's operating expenses for the 16immediately preceding calendar year, then the municipality may 17establish an OPEB trust or deposit moneys into an existing 18OPEB trust.19    (c) Trusts created by a municipality under this Section 20are in addition to pension benefits provided by the 21municipality for its employees under the Illinois Pension 22Code.23    (d) The OPEB trusts may employ such personnel and enter   SB0638 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06916 RTM 16952 b1into investment, advisory, or professional services or similar 2contracts as deemed appropriate by the corporate authorities 3of the municipality and recommended by the Treasurer of the 4municipality.5    (e) The OPEB trusts may be established in a manner so as to 6be exempt from taxation under the provisions of applicable 7federal and State tax laws.8    (f) The trustee of the OPEB trusts shall be the 9municipality. The treasurer of the municipality and the 10trustee shall be indemnified by the municipality to the 11fullest extent permitted by law for their actions taken with 12respect to the OPEB trust.13    (g) The assets of an OPEB trust shall be managed by the 14treasurer of the municipality in any manner, subject only to 15the prudent investor standard and any requirements of 16applicable federal law. The limitations of any other statute 17affecting the investment of municipal funds shall not apply to 18OPEB trusts. The trustee shall adopt an investment policy 19consistent with the standards articulated in Section 2.5 of 20the Public Funds Investment Act. The investment policy shall 21also provide for the availability of training. Funds of the 22OPEB trusts may be used to pay for costs of administering the 23OPEB trusts and for the benefits for which the trusts have been 24established in accordance with the terms of the OPEB trust 25documents.